District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.20

Repealed

Severability.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 802, ch. 736, § 22
July 15, 1949, 63 Stat. 441, ch. 338, title VI, § 609
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 303(c), 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 5-820.
1973 Ed., § 5-719.